Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-3305
Annual computer science and technology education status report.

On or before December 1, 2026, and on or before December 1 of each year thereafter, in order to promote and support computer science and technology education, each school district shall provide an annual computer science and technology education status report to its school board and the State Department of Education, including, but not limited to, student progress on the computer science and technology courses and other district-determined measures of computer science and technology education progress from the previous school year.

Laws 2022, LB1112, § 5;

Laws 2023, LB705, § 102.